Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. PUBLIC SAFETY

SUBTITLE C. PUBLIC SAFETY PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 370. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS RELATING TO HEALTH AND PUBLIC SAFETY OF MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 370.001. HEALTH CONTRACTS IN BORDER MUNICIPALITIES OR COUNTIES. The governing body of a municipality or county that has a boundary that is contiguous with the border between this state and the Republic of Mexico may contract with a border municipality or state in the Republic of Mexico to provide or receive health services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 370.003. MUNICIPAL OR COUNTY POLICY REGARDING ENFORCEMENT OF DRUG LAWS. The governing body of a municipality, the commissioners court of a county, or a sheriff, municipal police department, municipal attorney, county attorney, district attorney, or criminal district attorney may not adopt a policy under which the entity will not fully enforce laws relating to drugs, including Chapters 481 and 483, Health and Safety Code, and federal law.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 971, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 370.004. NOTICE OF DAMAGED FENCE. (a) A peace officer employed by a political subdivision of this state who investigates or responds to an incident in which a motor vehicle damages a fence shall, if the peace officer reasonably believes that the fence is intended to contain livestock or other animals:

(1) immediately determine the owner of the land on which the damaged fence is located; and

(2) notify the owner of the type and extent of the damage, if the owner has registered with the political subdivision in accordance with Subsection (c).

(b) A peace officer is not liable to an owner of land or any other person for damage resulting from the peace officer's failure to notify the owner under Subsection (a).

(c) A landowner must provide an agency or department of a political subdivision that employs peace officers with the following information if the landowner would like a peace officer of that agency or department to notify the landowner of damage under Subsection (a):

(1) the landowner's name, address, and telephone number; and

(2) the location and a description of the landowner's property.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 330 (H.B. 2931), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 370.005. MUNICIPAL OR COUNTY POLICY REGARDING MAINTENANCE OF PORTABLE FIRE EXTINGUISHERS IN GOVERNMENT-OWNED VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "local government" means:

(1) a county;

(2) a municipality; or

(3) an agency, department, or other division of a county or municipality.

(b) A local government that adopts an ordinance, order, or policy requiring motor vehicles owned by the local government to be equipped with portable fire extinguishers shall require maintenance to be performed on the portable fire extinguishers annually in accordance with standards that are at least as stringent as the National Fire Protection Association Standard Number 10, Portable Fire Extinguishers.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 125 (H.B. 564), Sec. 2, eff. May 27, 2011.

Sec. 370.006. ASSISTANCE IN MAN-MADE OR NATURAL DISASTER. (a) The governing body of a municipality, the chief of the fire department, or an emergency management director or coordinator designated for the municipality under Section 418.1015, Government Code, may request or accept any care, assistance, or advice described by Section 79.003(a), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, including the loan or operation of construction equipment or other heavy equipment by the owner or operator of the equipment, as applicable, or the donation of resources to the extent the governing body, chief, or emergency management director or coordinator believes necessary to address a man-made or natural disaster.

(b) The commissioners court of a county, the county judge, the county fire marshal, an incorporated volunteer fire department under contract with a county under Section 352.001, a volunteer fire department described by Section 352.005, as applicable, or an emergency management director or coordinator designated for the county under Section 418.1015, Government Code, may request or accept any care, assistance, or advice described by Section 79.003(a), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, including the loan or operation of construction equipment or other heavy equipment by the owner or operator of the equipment, as applicable, or the donation of resources to the extent the commissioners court, county judge, county fire marshal, volunteer fire department, or emergency management director or coordinator believes necessary to address a man-made or natural disaster.

(c) A person as defined by Section 79.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, who provides care, assistance, or advice to a municipality or county in the manner described by this section is immune from civil liability as provided by Section 79.003, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(d) Subsection (a) or (b) does not authorize the acceptance of care, assistance, or advice in violation of any other law or contractual agreement that prohibits the acceptance of that care, assistance, or advice.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 141 (H.B. 487), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2013.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 1319), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (H.B. 1819), Sec. 6, see other Sec. 370.007.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 252), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 370.007.

Sec. 370.007. PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT FOR OVERDOSE MAPPING. (a) A local health authority or law enforcement agency shall enter into a participation agreement with an entity that maintains a computerized system for mapping overdoses of one or more controlled substances for public safety purposes.

(b) A local health authority or law enforcement agency shall provide information received under Section 161.045, Health and Safety Code, to the entity with which the authority or agency has a participation agreement under Subsection (a) for purposes of entering the information into the computerized system. The local health authority or law enforcement agency is not required to provide information received under Section 161.045, Health and Safety Code, regarding a controlled substance to the entity with which the authority or agency has a participation agreement if the entity does not maintain an overdose map that includes the controlled substance.

(c) A local health authority or law enforcement agency or an employee of a local health authority or law enforcement agency is not subject to civil or criminal liability for providing information received under Section 161.045, Health and Safety Code, to an entity pursuant to a participation agreement under this section.

(d) Information provided to an entity pursuant to a participation agreement under this section is confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(e) This section does not waive sovereign immunity to suit or liability.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 1319), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (H.B. 1819), Sec. 6

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 1319), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 370.007.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 252), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 370.007.

Sec. 370.007. JUVENILE CURFEWS PROHIBITED. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a political subdivision may not adopt or enforce an order, ordinance, or other measure that imposes a curfew to regulate the movements or actions of persons younger than 18 years of age.

(b) This section does not apply to a curfew implemented under Chapter 418, Government Code, for purposes of emergency management.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (H.B. 1819), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 252), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 1319), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 370.007.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (H.B. 1819), Sec. 6, see other Sec. 370.007.

Sec. 370.007. APPOINTING OR EMPLOYING CERTAIN VETERANS TO POSITION REQUIRING LICENSURE. (a) In this section, "commission" means the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a political subdivision that appoints or employs a person to hold a position that requires the person to be licensed by the commission may appoint or employ a legal permanent resident of the United States to hold the position if the person is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States with at least two years of service before discharge and holds the appropriate license issued by the commission.

(c) A political subdivision may not appoint or employ a person under this section to hold a supervisory position until the person becomes a United States citizen.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 252), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.